Maine, session 132, LD1946.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 34-B MRSA §3012 is enacted to read:
§3012. Residents of certified recovery residences
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Certified recovery residence" means a residence that is certified pursuant to the
requirements established in Title 5, section 20005, subsection 22.
B. "Program" means the Bridging Rental Assistance Program established in section
3011 and administered by the department.
2. Eligibility of residents. An individual residing in a certified recovery residence is
eligible to apply for a program housing voucher to be used upon the individual's departure
from the certified recovery residence, as long as the individual meets all applicable
standards and conditions established by the department for the program. Residency in a
certified recovery residence may not be construed as a barrier to application or receipt of
such a voucher. This section does not authorize individuals to use program housing
vouchers to subsidize the cost of residing at a certified recovery residence.
3. Guidance. The department shall provide guidance to certified recovery residences
and housing assistance programs to ensure consistent application of this section, including
public education efforts to inform residents of certified recovery residences and providers
in certified recovery residences of their rights and responsibilities under this section.
4. Rulemaking. The department shall adopt or amend rules as necessary to implement
the provisions of this section. In adopting rules, the department shall ensure that individuals
being released from institutions, individuals being released from incarceration and
homeless individuals have priority over individuals residing in certified recovery
residences in the award of program housing vouchers. Rules adopted pursuant to this
subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Page 1 - 132LR1398(03)